North Carolina statutes. Chapter 116. Higher Education.
Article 21B. The Centennial Campus, the Horace Williams Campus, and the Millennial Campuses Financing Act.

§ 116-198.31.
Purpose of Article.

The purpose of this Article is to authorize the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina to issue revenue bonds, payable from any leases, rentals, charges, fees, and other revenues but with no pledge of taxes or the faith and credit of the State or any agency or political subdivision thereof, to pay the cost, in whole or part, of buildings, structures, or other facilities for the Centennial Campus, located at North Carolina State University at Raleigh, for the Horace Williams Campus located at the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill, and for any Millennial Campus as defined by

G.S. 116-198.33(4b)

.

History.

1987, c. 336, s. 1; 1999-234, s. 3; 2000-177, ss. 3, 4.

§ 116-198.32.
Credit and taxing power of State not pledged; statement on face of bonds.

Revenue bonds issued as in this Article provided shall not be deemed to constitute a debt or liability of the State or any political subdivision thereof or a pledge of the faith and credit of the State or of any such political subdivision, but shall be payable solely from the funds herein provided therefor from revenues. All such revenue bonds shall contain on the face thereof a statement to the effect that neither the State nor the Board (herein mentioned) shall be obligated to pay the same or the interest thereon except from revenues as herein defined and that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the State or of any political subdivision or instrumentality thereof is pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on such bonds. The issuance of revenue bonds hereunder shall not directly or indirectly or contingently obligate the State or any political subdivision thereof to levy or to pledge any taxes whatsoever therefor.

History.

1987, c. 336, s. 1.

§ 116-198.33.
Definitions.

As used in this Article, the following words and terms shall have the following meanings, unless the context shall indicate another or different meaning or intent:

The word “Board” shall mean the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina.

The word “cost” as applied to any project, shall include the cost of acquisition or construction; the cost of acquisition of all property, both real and personal, or interests therein; the cost of demolishing, removing, or relocating any buildings or structures on land so acquired, including the cost of acquiring any lands to which such buildings or structures may be removed or relocated; the cost of all labor, materials, equipment and furnishings, financing charges, interest prior to and during construction and, if deemed advisable by the Board, for a period not exceeding one year after completion of such construction; provisions for working capital, reserves for debt service and for extensions, enlargements, additions, and improvements; cost of engineering, financial, and legal services, plans, specifications, studies, surveys, and estimates of cost and of revenues; administrative expenses; expenses necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicability of constructing the project; and such other expenses as may be necessary or incident to acquisition or construction with respect to the project or to the placing of the project in operation. Any obligation or expense incurred by the Board prior to the issuance of bonds under the provisions of this Article in connection with any of the foregoing items of cost may be regarded as a part of such cost.

The word “Institution” shall mean North Carolina State University at Raleigh and the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill, or a constituent institution or affiliated institution of The University of North Carolina with a Millennial Campus as defined by

G.S. 116-198.33(4b)

.

The term “Centennial Campus” means all of the following properties:

The real property and appurtenant facilities bounded by Blue Ridge Road, Hillsborough Street, Wade Avenue, and Interstate 440 that are the sites of the College of Veterinary Medicine, the University Club, and the Agricultural Turf Grass Management Program.

The real property and appurtenant facilities that are the former Dix Hospital properties and other contiguous parcels of property that are adjacent to Centennial Boulevard.

All other real property and appurtenant facilities designated by the Board of Governors as part of the Centennial Campus. The properties designated by the Board of Governors do not have to be contiguous with the Centennial Campus to be designated as part of that Campus.

(4a)

The term “Horace Williams Campus” means all of the following properties:

a.

The real property and appurtenant facilities left to the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill by the Will of Henry Horace Williams.

b.

All other real property and appurtenant facilities designated by the Board of Governors as part of the Horace Williams Campus. The properties designated by the Board of Governors do not have to be contiguous with the Horace Williams Campus to be designated as part of that Campus.

(4b)

The term “Millennial Campus” means all real property and appurtenant facilities designated by the Board of Governors as part of a Millennial Campus of a constituent institution or affiliated institution of The University of North Carolina other than North Carolina State University or the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill. The properties designated by the Board of Governors do not have to be contiguous with the constituent institution or an affiliated institution to be designated as part of the institution’s Millennial Campus.

The term “existing facilities” shall mean buildings and facilities, then existing, any part of the revenues of which are pledged under the provisions of any resolution authorizing the issuance of revenue bonds hereunder to the payment of such bonds.

The word “project” shall mean and shall include any one or more buildings, structures, administration buildings, libraries, research or instructional facilities, housing maintenance, storage, or utility facilities, and any facilities related thereto or required or useful for conducting of research or the operation of the Centennial Campus, the Horace Williams Campus, or of a Millennial Campus as defined by

G.S. 116-198.33(4b)

, including roads, water, sewer, power, gas, greenways, parking, or any other support facilities essential or convenient for the orderly conduct of the Centennial Campus, the Horace Williams Campus, or a Millennial Campus, respectively.

The word “revenues” shall mean all or any part of the rents, leases, charges, fees, and other income revenues derived from or in connection with any project or projects and existing facilities.

History.

1987, c. 336, s. 1; 1998-159, s. 2; 1999-234, s. 4; 2000-177, s. 5; 2020-56, s. 8(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2020-56, s. 8(a), effective June 30, 2020, inserted “or affiliated institution” in subdivisions (3) and (4b), and inserted “or an affiliated institution” in subdivision (4b).

§ 116-198.34.
General powers of Board of Governors.

The Board may exercise any one or more of the following powers:

To determine the location and character of any project or projects, and to acquire, construct, and provide the same, and to maintain, repair, and operate, and to enter into contracts for the management, lease, use, or operation of all or any portion of any project or projects and any existing facilities.

To issue revenue bonds as hereinafter provided to pay all or any part of the cost of any project or projects, and to fund or refund the same.

To fix and revise from time to time and charge and collect rates, fees, rents, and charges for the use of, and for the services furnished by, all or any portion of any project or projects.

To establish and enforce, and to agree through any resolution or trust agreement authorizing or securing bonds under this Article to make and enforce, rules and regulations for the use of and services rendered by any project or projects and any existing facilities, to provide for the maximum use of any project or projects and any existing facilities.

To acquire, hold, lease, and dispose of real and personal property in the exercise of its powers and the performance of its duties hereunder and to lease all or any part of any project or projects and any existing facilities upon such terms and conditions as the Board determines, subject to the provisions of

G.S. 143-341

and Chapter 146 of the General Statutes.Notwithstanding

G.S. 143-341

and Chapter 146 of the General Statutes, an acquisition for a period of 10 years or less or a disposition of 99 years or less by easement, lease, or rental agreement of real property or space in any building on the Centennial Campus, on the Horace Williams Campus, on a Millennial Campus, or on a Kannapolis Research Campus shall not require the approval of the Governor and the Council of State. The Board shall report the acquisitions or dispositions described in this paragraph of this subdivision to the Department of Administration for inclusion in the inventory maintained by Department pursuant to

G.S. 143-341(4)

a. and b. and the information regarding those transactions that is required by

G.S. 143-341(4)

a. and b. All other acquisitions and dispositions made under this subdivision for a period in excess of the terms described in this paragraph of this subdivision are subject to the provisions of G.S. 143-341 and Chapter 146 of the General Statutes.

To employ consulting engineers, architects, attorneys, accountants, construction and financial experts, superintendents, managers, and such other employees and agents as may be necessary in its judgment in connection with any project or projects and existing facilities, and to fix their compensation.

To make and enter into all contracts and agreements necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties and the execution of its powers under this Article.

To receive and accept from any federal, State, or other public agency and any private agency, person or other entity donations, loans, grants, aid, or contributions of any money, property, labor, or other things of value for any project or projects, and to agree to apply and use the same in accordance with the terms and conditions under which the same are provided.

(8a)

To designate the real property and appurtenant facilities to be included as part of the Centennial Campus, the Horace Williams Campus, or a Millennial Campus.

(8b)

Acting on recommendation made by the President of The University of North Carolina after consultation by the President with the Chancellor and the Board of Trustees of a constituent institution, or by the President with the chief executive officer or equivalent executive position for an affiliated institution, to designate real property held by, or to be acquired by, a constituent institution or an affiliated institution as a “Millennial Campus” of the institution. That designation shall be based on an express finding by the Board of Governors that the institution desiring to create a “Millennial Campus” has the administrative and fiscal capability to create and maintain such a campus and provided further, that the Board of Governors has found that the creation of the constituent institution’s or affiliated institution’s “Millennial Campus” will enhance the institution’s research, teaching, and service missions as well as enhance the economic development of the region served by the institution. Upon formal request by the institutions, the Board of Governors may authorize two or more institutions which meet the requirements of this section to create a joint Millennial Campus.

To do all acts and things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers granted by this Article.

History.

1987, c. 336, s. 1; 1998-159, s. 3; 1999-234, s. 5; 2000-177, s. 6; 2012-142, s. 9.10(b); 2013-360, s. 11.10(a), (b); 2013-363, s. 3.12; 2014-100, s. 36.7(a), (b); 2020-56, s. 8(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-142, s. 9.10(b), effective July 1, 2012, and expiring June 30, 2015, substituted “on a Millennial Campus, or on a Kannapolis Research Campus” for “or a Millennial Campus”, and inserted “for a period in excess of 10 years” in the paragraph following subdivision (5).

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 11.10(a), effective July 1, 2013, in the second paragraph of subdivision (5), inserted “an acquisition for a period of 10 years or less or,” “of 65 years or less,” and “real property or,” and deleted “made for a period of 10 years or less” following “Kannapolis Research Campus,” in the first sentence, added the second sentence, and substituted “the terms described in this paragraph of this subdivision” for “10 years” in the last sentence. For expiration date, see Editor’s note.

Session Laws 2014-100, s. 36.7(a), effective July 1, 2014, substituted “disposition of 99 years” for “disposition of 65 years” in the second paragraph in subdivision (5).

Session Laws 2020-56, s. 8(b), effective June 30, 2020, in subdivision (8b), inserted “or by the President with the chief executive officer or equivalent executive position for an affiliated institution” and “or an affiliated institution” in the first sentence, and inserted “or affiliated institution’s” in the second sentence, and deleted “constituent” preceding “institutions” twice in the last sentence.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

Concurrence of the Department of Administration and formal approval by the Governor and Council of State will be required for a ground-lease of Centennial Campus property for construction of a Conference center/hotel and golf course. See opinion of Attorney General to Representative Martin L. Nesbitt, North Carolina General Assembly, 2002 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 33 (11/26/02).

§ 116-198.35.
Issuance of bonds and bond anticipation notes.

The Board is hereby authorized to issue, subject to the approval of the Director of the Budget, at one time or from time to time, revenue bonds of the Board for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of acquiring, constructing, or providing any project or projects on the Centennial Campus, on the Horace Williams Campus, or on a Millennial Campus. The bonds of each issue shall be dated, shall mature at such time or times not exceeding 40 years from their date or dates, shall bear interest at such rate or rates as may be determined by the Board, and may be redeemable before maturity, at the option of the Board, at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as may be fixed by the Board prior to the issuance of the bonds. The Board shall determine the form and manner of execution of the bonds, including any interest coupons to be attached thereto, and shall fix the denomination or denominations of the bonds and the place or places of payment of principal and interest, which may be at any bank or trust company within or without the State. In case any officer whose signature or a facsimile of whose signature shall appear on any bonds or coupons shall cease to be such officer before the delivery of such bonds, such signature or such facsimile shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if he had remained in office until such delivery. Notwithstanding any of the other provisions of this Article or any recitals in any bonds issued under the provisions of this Article, all such bonds shall be deemed to be negotiable instruments under the laws of this State, subject only to the provisions for registration in any resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or any trust agreement securing the same. The bonds may be issued in coupon or registered form or both or as book-entry bonds, as the Board may determine, and provision may be made for the registration of any coupon bonds as to principal alone and also as to both principal and interest, and for the reconversion into coupon bonds of any bonds registered as to both principal and interest. The Board may sell such bonds in such manner, at public or private sale, and for such price, as it may determine to be for the best interests of the Board.

The proceeds of the bonds of each issue shall be used solely for the purpose for which such bonds shall have been authorized and shall be disbursed in such manner and under such restrictions, if any, as the Board may provide in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or in the trust agreement hereinafter mentioned securing the same. Unless otherwise provided in the authorizing resolution or in the trust agreement securing such bonds, if the proceeds of such bonds, by error of estimates or otherwise, shall be less than such cost, additional bonds may in like manner be issued to provide the amount of such deficit and shall be deemed to be of the same issue and shall be entitled to payment from the same fund without preference or priority of the bonds first issued for the same purpose.

The resolution providing for the issuance of revenue bonds, and any trust agreement securing such bonds, may also contain such limitations upon the issuance of additional revenue bonds as the Board may deem proper, and such additional bonds shall be issued under such restrictions and limitations as may be prescribed by such resolution or trust agreement.

Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds, the Board may, under like restrictions, issue interim receipts or temporary bonds, with or without coupons, exchangeable for definitive bonds when such bonds shall have been executed and are available for delivery. The Board may also provide for the replacement of any bonds which shall become mutilated or be destroyed or lost.

Except as herein otherwise provided, bonds may be issued under this Article and other powers vested in the Board under this Article may be exercised by the Board without obtaining the consent of any department, division, commission, board, bureau, or agency of the State and without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things than those proceedings, conditions, or things which are specifically required by this Article.

The Board may enter into or negotiate a note with an acceptable bank or trust company in lieu of issuing bonds for the financing of projects covered under this section. The terms and conditions of any note of this nature shall be in accordance with the terms and conditions surrounding issuance of bonds.

The Board is hereby authorized to issue, subject to the approval of the Director of the Budget, at one time or from time to time, revenue bond anticipation notes of the Board in anticipation of the issuance of bonds authorized pursuant to the provisions of this Article. The principal of and the interest on such notes shall be payable solely from the proceeds of bonds or renewal notes, or, in the event bond or renewal note proceeds are not available, any available revenues of the project or projects for which such bonds shall have been authorized. The notes of each issue shall be dated, shall mature at such time or times not exceeding two years from their date or dates, shall bear interest at such rate or rates as may be determined by the Board, and may be redeemable before maturity, at the option of the Board, at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as may be fixed by the Board prior to the issuance of the notes. The Board shall determine the form and the manner of execution of the notes, including any interest coupons to be attached thereto, and shall fix the denomination or denominations of the notes and the place or places of payment of principal and interest, which may be at any bank or trust company within or without the State. In case any officer whose signature or a facsimile of whose signature shall appear on any notes or coupons shall cease to be such officer before the delivery of such notes, such signature or such facsimile shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if he had remained in office until such delivery. Notwithstanding any of the other provisions of this Article or any recitals in any notes issued under the provisions of this Article, all such notes shall be deemed to be negotiable instruments under the laws of this State, subject only to the provisions for registration in any resolution authorizing the issuance of such notes or any trust agreement securing the bonds in anticipation of which such notes are being issued. The notes may be issued in coupon or registered form or both or as book entry notes, as the Board may determine, and provision may be made for the registration of any coupon notes as to principal alone and also as to both principal and interest, and for the reconversion into coupon notes of any notes registered as to both principal and interest. The Board may sell such notes in such manner, at public or private sale, and for such price, as it may determine to be for the best interests of the Board.

The proceeds of the notes of each issue shall be used solely for the purpose for which the bonds in anticipation of which such notes are being issued shall have been authorized, and such note proceeds shall be disbursed in such manner and under such restrictions, if any, as the Board may provide in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such notes or bonds or in the trust agreement securing such bonds.

The resolution providing for the issuance of notes, and any trust agreement securing the bonds in anticipation of which such notes are being authorized, may also contain such limitations upon the issuance of additional notes as the Board may deem proper, and such additional notes shall be issued under such restrictions and limitations as may be prescribed by such resolution or trust agreement. The Board may also provide for the replacement of any notes which shall become mutilated or be destroyed or lost.

Except as herein otherwise provided, notes may be issued under this Article and other powers vested in the Board under this Article may be exercised by the Board without obtaining the consent of any department, division, commission, board, bureau, or agency of the State and without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things than those proceedings, conditions, or things which are specifically required by this Article.

Unless the context shall otherwise indicate, the word “bonds” wherever used in this Article, shall be deemed and construed to include the words “bond anticipation notes.”

History.

1987, c. 336, s. 1; 1999-234, s. 6; 2000-177, s. 7.

§ 116-198.36.
Proceeds of bonds are deemed trust funds.

In the discretion of the Board and subject to the approval of the Director of the Budget, any revenue bonds issued under this Article may be secured by a trust agreement by and between the Board and a corporate trustee (or trustees) which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the State. Such trust agreement or the resolution providing for the issuance of such bonds may pledge or assign the revenues to be received but shall not convey or mortgage any project or projects or any existing facilities or any part thereof. Such trust agreement or resolution providing for the issuance of such bonds may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the holders of such bonds as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including covenants setting forth the duties of the Board in relation to the acquisition, construction, or provision of any project or projects, the maintenance, repair, operation, and insurance of any project or projects and any existing facilities, student fees and admission fees and charges, and other fees, rents, and charges to be fixed and collected, and the custody, safeguarding, and application of all moneys. It shall be lawful for any bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of the State which may act as depositary of the proceeds of bonds or revenues to furnish such indemnifying bonds or to pledge such securities as may be required by the Board. Any such trust agreement or resolution may set forth the rights and remedies of the holders of the bonds and the rights, remedies, and immunities of the trustee or trustees, if any, and may restrict the individual right of action by such holders. In addition to the foregoing, any such trust agreement or resolution may contain such other provisions as the Board may deem reasonable and proper for the security of such holders. All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of such trust agreement or resolution may be treated as a part of the cost of the project or projects for which such bonds are issued or as an expense of operation of such project or projects, as the case may be.

The proceeds of all bonds issued and all revenues and other moneys received pursuant to the authority of this Article shall be deemed to be trust funds, to be held and applied solely as provided in this Article. The Board may provide for the payment of the proceeds of the sale of the bonds and the revenues, or part thereof, to such officer, board, or depositary as it may designate for the custody thereof, and for the method of disbursement thereof, with such safeguards and restrictions as it may determine. Any officer with whom, or any bank, trust company, or fiscal agent with which, such moneys shall be deposited shall act as trustee of such moneys and shall hold and apply the same for the purposes hereof, subject to such requirements as are provided in this Article and in the resolution or trust agreement authorizing or securing such bonds.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, the Board may carry insurance on any project or projects and any existing facilities in such amounts and covering such risks as it may deem advisable.

Any holder of bonds issued under this Article or of any of the coupons appertaining thereto, and the trustee or trustees under any trust agreement, except to the extent the rights herein given may be restricted by such trust agreement or the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds, may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus, or other proceedings, protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the State or granted hereunder or under such trust agreement or resolution, and may enforce and compel the performance of all duties required by this Article or by such trust agreement or resolution to be performed by the Board or by any officer thereof, including the fixing, charging, and collecting of fees, rents, and charges.

History.

1987, c. 336, s. 1.

§ 116-198.37.
Fixing fees, rents, and charges; sinking fund.

For the purpose of aiding in the acquisition, construction, or provision of any project and the maintenance, repair, and operation of any project or any existing facilities, the Board is authorized to fix, revise from time to time, charge, and collect such fee or fees for such privileges and services and in such amount or amounts as the Board shall determine, and to fix, revise from time to time, charge, and collect other fees, rents, and charges for the use of and for the services furnished or to be furnished by any project or projects and any existing facilities, or any portion thereof, and to contract with any person, partnership, association, or corporation for the lease, use, occupancy, or operation of any project or projects and any existing facilities, or any part thereof, and to fix the terms, conditions, fees, rents, and charges for any such lease, use, occupancy, or operation. So long as bonds issued hereunder and payable therefrom are outstanding, such fees, rents, and charges shall be so fixed and adjusted, with relation to other revenues available therefor, as to provide funds pursuant to the requirements of the resolution or trust agreement authorizing or securing such bonds at least sufficient with such other revenues, if any, (i) to pay the cost of maintaining, repairing, and operating any project or projects and any existing facilities any part of the revenues of which are pledged to the payment of the bonds issued for such project or projects, (ii) to pay the principal of and the interest on such bonds as the same shall become due and payable, and (iii) to create and maintain reserves for such purposes. Any surplus funds remaining after application to the purposes mentioned in (i), (ii), and (iii), above, shall be held in trust and applied by the Board to the development of the Centennial Campus, the Horace Williams Campus, or a Millennial Campus, as applicable. Such fees, rents, and charges shall not be subject to supervision or regulation by any other commission, board, bureau, or agency of the State. A sufficient amount of the revenues, except such part thereof as may be necessary to pay such cost of maintenance, repair, and operation and to provide such reserves therefor and for renewals, replacements, extensions, enlargements, and improvements as may be provided for in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or in the trust agreement securing the same, shall be set aside at such regular intervals as may be provided in such resolution or such trust agreement in a sinking fund which is hereby pledged to and charged with the payment of the principal of and the interest on such bonds as the same shall become due and the redemption price or the purchase price of bonds retired by call or purchase as therein provided. Such pledge shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made; the fees, rents, and charges and other revenues or other moneys so pledged and thereafter received by the Board shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act; and the lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the Board, irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof. Neither the resolution nor any trust agreement by which a pledge is created need be filed or recorded except in the records of the Board. The use and disposition of moneys to the credit of such sinking fund shall be subject to the provisions of the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or of the trust agreement securing the same.

History.

1987, c. 336, s. 1; 1999-234, s. 7; 2000-177, s. 8.

§ 116-198.38.
Refunding bonds.

The Board is hereby authorized, subject to the approval of the Director of the Budget, to issue from time to time revenue refunding bonds for the purpose of refunding any revenue bonds or revenue refunding bonds issued by the Board under this Article, including the payment of any redemption premium thereon and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption of such bonds. The Board is further authorized, subject to the approval of the Director of the Budget, to issue from time to time revenue refunding bonds for the combined purpose of (i) refunding any such revenue bonds or revenue refunding bonds issued by the Board under this Article, including the payment of any redemption premium thereon and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption of such bonds, and (ii) paying all or any part of the cost of acquiring or constructing any additional project or projects.

The issuance of such refunding bonds, the maturities and other details thereof, the rights and remedies of the holders thereof, and the rights, powers, privileges, duties, and obligations of the Board with respect to the same, shall be governed by the foregoing provisions of this Article insofar as the same may be applicable.

History.

1987, c. 336, s. 1.

§ 116-198.39.
Bonds are exempt from taxation.

Any bonds issued under this Article shall at all times be exempt from all taxes or assessment, direct or indirect, general or special, whether imposed for the purpose of general revenue or otherwise, which are levied or assessed by the State or by any county, political subdivision, agency, or other instrumentality of the State, excluding income taxes on the gain from the transfer of the bonds, and franchise taxes. The interest on the bonds is not subject to taxation as income. Bonds issued by the Board under the provisions of this Article are hereby made securities in which all public officers and public bodies of the State and its political subdivisions, all insurance companies, trust companies, banking associations, investment companies, executors, administrators, trustees, and other fiduciaries may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them. Such bonds are hereby made securities which may properly and legally be deposited with and received by any State or municipal officer or any agency or political subdivision of the State for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or obligations of the State is now or may hereafter be authorized by law.

History.

1987, c. 336, s. 1; 1995, c. 46, s. 8; 2015-264, s. 16(e).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-264, s. 16(e), effective October 1, 2015, deleted “inheritance and gift taxes” preceding “income taxes on the gain” near the end of the first sentence.

§ 116-198.40.
Article provides additional and alternative method of financing; not exclusive.

This Article shall be deemed to provide an additional and alternative method for the doing of the things authorized hereby and shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws, and shall not be regarded as in derogation of or as repealing any powers now existing under any other law, either general, special, or local; provided, however, that the issuance of revenue bonds or revenue refunding bonds under the provisions of this Article need not comply with the requirements of any other law applicable to the issuance of bonds.

History.

1987, c. 336, s. 1.